Washington statutes.
RCW 39.108.060

Determination of total number of transferable development rights for agricultural and forestland of long-term commercial significance and designated rural zoned lands.

On or before September 1, 2011, each eligible county must report to the Puget Sound regional council the total number of transferable development rights from agricultural and forestland of long-term commercial significance and designated rural zoned lands within the eligible county that may be available for allocation to receiving cities under this chapter, as determined under RCW 39.108.040 and 39.108.050.

[ 2011 c 318 s 304.]

NOTES:

Rules—2011 c 318: See note following RCW 39.108.005.